Louisiana, session 2026, HB610.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:100.112(E)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§100.112. Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund
* * *
E.(1)(a) Except as provided for in Subsection F of this Section, monies
deposited into the Revenue Stabilization Trust Fund shall be permanently credited
to the trust fund and shall be invested by the treasurer in the same manner as
investments of the Millennium Trust, as provided in R.S. 39:98.2.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph
regarding investment of monies in the fund, an aggregate amount not to exceed ten
percent of monies in the fund may be invested in gold bullion, gold specie, or both.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1051 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 610
For the purposes of this Subparagraph, the term "gold bullion" means gold formed
into uniform shapes and quantities such as ingots, bars, or plates, with uniform
content and purity as are suitable for or customarily used in the purchase, sale,
storage, transfer, and delivery of bulk or wholesale transactions in precious metals.
For the purposes of this Subparagraph, the term "gold specie" means gold stamped
into coins of uniform shape, size, design, content, and purity suitable for or
customarily used as currency; as a medium of exchange; or as the medium for
purchase, sale, storage, transfer, or delivery of precious metals in retail or wholesale
transactions.
* * *
Section 2. The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to enter into any
contracts necessary for the implementation and administration of the provisions of this Act,
including contracting with a depository to serve as the custodian, guardian, and administrator
of any bullion or specie that may be acquired pursuant to the provisions of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article VII, Section 14(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the
Act which originated as House Bill No. 603 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature
is adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.